Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.432

[Art. 52] Number of votes required.

(1) No person may be convicted of an offense, except as provided in RCW 38.38.404(2) or by the concurrence of two-thirds of the members present at the time the vote is taken.

(2) All sentences shall be determined by the concurrence of two-thirds of the members present at the time that the vote is taken.

(3) All other questions to be decided by the members of a general or special court-martial shall be determined by a majority vote, but a determination to reconsider a finding of guilty, or to reconsider a sentence with a view towards decreasing it, may be made by any lesser vote which indicates that the reconsideration is not opposed by the number of votes required for that finding or sentence. A tie vote on a challenge disqualifies the member challenged. A tie vote on a motion for a finding of not guilty or on a motion relating to the question of the accused's sanity is a determination against the accused. A tie vote on any other question is a determination in favor of the accused.

[ 1989 c 48 s 49; 1963 c 220 s 54.]